North Carolina, session 2025, HB652.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-18.05(b)(1a) reads as rewritten:
"(1a) Efficiency. – The Department shall adopt procedures in all stages of the
construction process to streamline project delivery, including consolidating
environmental review processes, expediting multiagency reviews,
accelerating right-of-way acquisitions, and pursuing design build and other
processes to collapse project stages. By December 1, 2015, the Department
shall establish a baseline unit pricing structure for transportation goods used
in highway maintenance and construction projects and set annual targets for
three years based on its unit pricing. In forming the baseline unit prices and
future targets, the Department shall collect data from each Highway Division
on its expenditures on transportation goods during the 2015-2016 fiscal year.
based upon a rolling average of the three previous fiscal years. Beginning
January 1, 2016, no Highway Division shall exceed a ten percent (10%)
variance over a baseline unit price set for that year in accordance with this
subdivision. The Department of Transportation shall institute annual tracking
to monitor pricing variances. The ten percent (10%) maximum variance set
under this subdivision is intended to account for regional differences requiring
varying product mixes. If a Highway Division exceeds the unit pricing
threshold, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative
Transportation Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division of the
General Assembly, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations
Committee on Transportation, and the chairs of the Senate Appropriations
Committee on the Department of Transportation no later than the fifteenth day
of February following the end of the calendar year on why the variance
occurred and what steps are being taken to bring the Highway Division back
into compliance. In order to drive savings, unit pricing may be reduced
annually as efficiencies are achieved."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H652-v-1*